Hawaii statutes.
§124A-68 Statute of limitations. (a)
A person charged with desertion or absence without leave in time of war, or
with aiding the enemy or with mutiny may be tried and punished at any time
without limitation.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
a person charged with desertion in time of peace or with the offense punishable
under section 124A-151 is not liable to be tried by court-martial if the
offense was committed more than three years before the receipt of sworn charges
and specifications by an officer exercising summary court-martial jurisdiction
over the command.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this
section, a person charged with any offense is not liable to be tried by
court-martial or punished under section 124A-21 if the offense was committed
more than two years before the receipt of sworn charges and specifications by
an officer exercising summary court-martial jurisdiction over the command or
before the imposition of punishment under section 124A-21.

(d) Periods in which the accused was absent
from territory in which the State has the authority to apprehend the accused,
or in the custody of civil authorities, or in the hands of the enemy, shall be
excluded in computing the period of limitation prescribed in this section. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; am L 1983, c 124, §4; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next